Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
14A

HAWAII
EMPLOYERS' MUTUAL INSURANCE COMPANY

§431:14A-101 Purpose. The Hawaii
employers' mutual insurance company is established to provide workers'
compensation coverage to employers of the State at the highest level of service
with the lowest possible cost, consistent with reasonable and applicable
actuarial standards and the sound financial integrity of the company. The
purposes of the company are to provide the highest standard of workplace safety
and loss prevention, to encourage employer involvement, and to be responsive to
each policyholder's experience, practice, and operating effectiveness. Nothing
in this article shall create any implied third-party duty or impose additional
legal liability for the company toward its members or beneficiaries beyond that
explicitly created by this chapter, chapter 386, or common law, and generally
applicable to all issuers of workers' compensation insurance in this State. [L
1996, c 261, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 52, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next